Rhode Island statutes. Title 8 Courts and Civil Procedure — Courts
Chapter 6 General Powers of Supreme and Superior Courts

8-6-1.
Judgments, decrees, and orders — Writs and process — Punishment of contempt.

The supreme and superior courts shall have power to enter such judgments, decrees, and orders, and to frame and issue such citations, executions, and other writs and processes, as may be necessary or proper to carry into full effect all the powers and jurisdiction which are or shall be conferred upon them respectively by the constitution or by law. They shall have power to punish, by fine or imprisonment, or both, all contempts of their authority.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 33; G.L. 1909, ch. 274, § 6; G.L. 1923, ch. 324, § 6; G.L. 1938, ch. 497, § 6; G.L. 1956, §

8-6-1

.

8-6-2.
Rules of practice and procedure.

The supreme court, the superior court, the family court, the district court, and the workers’ compensation court, by a majority of their members, shall have the power to make rules for regulating practice, procedure, and business therein. The chief magistrate of the traffic tribunal shall have the power to make rules for regulating practice, procedure, and business in the traffic tribunal. The rules of the superior, family, district court, workers’ compensation court, and the traffic tribunal shall be subject to the approval of the supreme court. Such rules, when effective, shall supersede any statutory regulation in conflict therewith.

In prescribing such rules, the court shall have regard to the simplification of the system of pleading, practice, and procedure in the courts in which the rules shall apply in order to promote the speedy determination of litigation on the merits; provided, however, that each respective court shall not in the rules of procedure require a party to a civil action to produce either by discovery, motion to produce or interrogatory an income tax return, W-2 statement, or copies thereof. The rules presently in effect in the courts of the judicial system shall remain and continue in force and effect until revised, amended, repealed, or superseded by rules adopted in accordance with this section.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 34; G.L. 1909, ch. 274, § 7; G.L. 1923, ch. 324, § 7; P.L. 1930, ch. 1613, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 497, § 7; P.L. 1940, ch. 943, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

8-6-2

; P.L. 1965, ch. 55, § 2; P.L. 1969, ch. 239, § 2; P.L. 1971, ch. 111, § 1; P.L. 1975, ch. 222, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 218, art. 5, § 8; P.L. 2008, ch. 1, § 2; P.L. 2013, ch. 29, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 44, § 1; P.L. 2022, ch. 234, art. 2, § 3, effective June 28, 2022.

8-6-3.
Filing and publication of rules.

All rules shall be filed in the office of the secretary of state and shall be effective upon filing unless with respect to any rule the court adopting the rule shall specify a later date as the effective date thereof, in which case the rule shall be effective upon the date so specified. With each publication of the public laws as required by §

43-2-7

, the secretary of state shall include all rules adopted since the last prior publication thereof.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 497, § 7; P.L. 1940, ch. 943, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

8-6-3

; P.L. 1985, ch. 150, § 15.

8-6-4.
Rules of criminal procedure.

The rules of criminal procedure of the superior court and the district court, which are to go into effect on September 1, 1972, shall govern practice and procedure in criminal proceedings in those courts and before justices of the peace and bail commissioners and shall remain and continue in force and effect until revised, amended, repealed, or superseded by rules adopted in accordance with the authority granted to those courts.

History of Section.

P.L. 1972, ch. 169, § 3.

8-6-5.
Arbitration of civil actions.

The presiding justice of the superior court may promulgate rules and regulations providing for compulsory and/or noncompulsory nonbinding arbitration of such category or categories of civil actions filed in, or appealed to, the superior court as he or she shall determine. The matter shall be heard by a single arbitrator who shall be selected by mutual agreement of the plaintiff(s) and defendant(s). If, after thirty (30) days, the plaintiff(s) and defendant(s) are unable to agree upon the selection of an arbitrator, a justice of the superior court shall select the arbitrator upon request in writing from either party. The costs of arbitration shall be borne by the Rhode Island state court system and a reasonable cost of the arbitration, not to exceed five hundred dollars ($500) per case, may be assessed and apportioned to each of the parties by the superior court pursuant to rules and regulations promulgated by the presiding justice of the superior court consistent with §

8-6-6

. The assessed costs received from the parties shall be deposited into the general fund. Any party dissatisfied with the decision of the arbitrator may demand a trial by jury if one was timely claimed in the complaint or answer, or a trial by judge if no jury trial was claimed. The decision of the arbitrator shall not be admissible at the trial. The court may require a party who rejects an arbitrator’s award and demands a trial to post a three hundred dollar ($300) filing fee and pay a technology surcharge in accordance with §

8-15-11

. The filing fee shall be posted with the superior court arbitration office and deposited into an arbitration fund restricted-receipt account established under the control of the state court director of finance. The arbitration funds shall not be subject to the indirect cost recoveries provisions set forth in §

35-4-27

. If more than one party rejects the arbitrator’s award and demands a trial, the filing fee, first received in the arbitration office, shall designate the party rejecting the award. Should the verdict at trial be more favorable to the party than the arbitrator’s award, the filing fee shall be reimbursed to that party. Should the verdict be equal to, or less favorable to, the party than the arbitrator’s award, the filing fee posted shall be forfeited as a sanction. If forfeited as a sanction, the fee shall remain available for program expenses from the arbitration fund restricted-receipt account. The presiding justice of the superior court shall be authorized to retain the services of qualified arbitrators and to direct payment for such services and other related expenses from the arbitration fund restricted-receipt account and may appoint an administrator of the arbitration program for a ten-year (10) term and until a successor is appointed and qualified.

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 522, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 429, § 1; P.L. 1991, ch. 365, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 188, § 1; P.L. 1994, ch. 70, art. 35, § 2; P.L. 2008, ch. 119, § 4; P.L. 2009, ch. 68, art. 10, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 293, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 402, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 34, § 2; P.L. 2014, ch. 42, § 2.

8-6-6.
Filing and publication of rules and regulations.

Upon the approval of the supreme court, all rules and regulations promulgated pursuant to §

8-6-5

shall be filed in the office of the secretary of state and shall be effective upon filing unless with respect to any such rule or regulation the presiding justice of the superior court shall specify a later date as the effective date thereof, in which case the rule or regulation shall be effective upon the date so specified. With each publication of the public laws as required by §

43-2-7

, the secretary of state shall include all such rules and regulations adopted since the last prior publication thereof.

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 522, § 1.